Utah statutes.
53B-16-210.   Salt Lake Community College -- School of Applied Technology Board of Directors -- Membership -- Duties.

(1)  Salt Lake Community College's School of Applied Technology shall have a board of directors composed of the following 14 members:

(a)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Salt Lake City School District;

(b)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Granite School District;

(c)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Canyons School District;

(d)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Jordan School District;

(e)  one elected local school board member appointed by the board of education for the Murray School District;

(f)  one member of the Salt Lake Community College board of trustees, appointed by the chair of the board of trustees;

(g)  one representative of groups who advocate for or provide services to populations of disadvantaged students, appointed by the president of Salt Lake Community College, in consultation with the School of Applied Technology's Board of Directors; and

(h)  seven representatives of business or industry employers within the region, appointed by the president of Salt Lake Community College, in consultation with the School of Applied Technology's Board of Directors, from names provided by business and industry associations representing sectors that employ workers with career and technical education.

(2)  The School of Applied Technology's Board of Directors shall:

(a)  consult on an ongoing basis with:

(i)  Salt Lake Community College;

(ii)  school districts and charter schools within its region;

(iii)  business and industry;

(iv)  craft, trade, and apprenticeship programs;

(v)  the Department of Workforce Services;

(vi)  the Governor's Office of Economic Development; and

(vii)  the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget;

(b)  prepare a comprehensive strategic plan for delivering career and technical education within Salt Lake County;

(c)  make recommendations regarding what skills are needed for employment in businesses and industries;

(d)  recommend the development of programs based upon the information gathered in accordance with Subsection (2)(a), including expedited program approval and termination procedures to meet market needs;

(e)  conduct annual program evaluations;

(f)  jointly appoint School of Applied Technology program advisory committees and other School of Applied Technology program advisory groups with the dean of the School of Applied Technology to provide counsel, support, and recommendations for updating and improving the effectiveness of non-credit career and technical education programs and services;

(g)  coordinate with local school boards, school districts, and charter schools to protect and enhance the non-credit career and technical education needs of secondary students;

(h)  adopt an annual budget and fund balances for the School of Applied Technology;

(i)  develop policies and procedures for the operation of the School of Applied Technology facilities under its jurisdiction;

(j)  recommend credentials for employees and the assignment of employees to duties in accordance with:

(i)  State Board of Regents and Salt Lake Community College policies;

(ii)  the Council on Occupational Education accreditation guidelines; and

(iii)  the Northwest Commission on Colleges and Universities accreditation guidelines;

(k)  develop policies and procedures for the admission, classification, instruction, and examination of students in accordance with the policies and accreditation guidelines of the Council on Occupational Education, the Northwest Commission on Colleges and Universities, the State Board of Regents, Salt Lake Community College Board of Trustees, and the State Board of Education; and

(l)  communicate regularly with the president of Salt Lake Community College regarding career and technical education issues.

(3)  If a program advisory committee or other advisory group submits a written recommendation to the School of Applied Technology's Board of Directors, the board of directors shall acknowledge the recommendation with a printed response that explains the board of directors' action regarding the recommendation and the reasons for the action.

(4) (a)  If the School of Applied Technology Board of Directors has specific recommendations to the Salt Lake Community College president, the recommendations shall be in a written form.

(b)  Recommendations described under Subsection (4)(a) may include:

(i)  additions, deletions, or expansions of non-credit career and technical education programs at Salt Lake Community College;

(ii)  updates and improvements in the effectiveness of School of Applied Technology non-credit career and technical education programs and services, including expedited program approval and termination of procedures, consistent with Board of Regents' policy;

(iii)  responsibilities described under Subsection (2); and

(iv)  other recommendations relating to the non-credit career and technical education mission of Salt Lake Community College.

(c)  If the president of Salt Lake Community College rejects a specific recommendation of the board of directors, the president shall:

(i)  notify the board of directors in writing within 10 working days of the rejection and the reasons for the rejection; and

(ii)  provide the board of directors an opportunity to modify its specific recommendation and resubmit it to the president.

(5)  The president of Salt Lake Community College and the chair of the School of Applied Technology's Board of Directors shall annually meet with the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees to provide:

(a)  the information described in Subsection 53B-16-209(4)(g); and

(b)  a report on the implementation of specific recommendations described in Subsection (4).

(6)  Salt Lake Community College School of Applied Technology shall provide staff support for the School of Applied Technology's Board of Directors.

